Nebraska, session 109, LB762.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. (1) Notwithstanding section 44-3,131, on or after January 1,
2027, (a) any individual or group sickness and accident insurance policy or
subscriber contract delivered, issued for delivery, or renewed in this state
and any hospital, medical, or surgical expense-incurred policy, except for
policies that provide coverage for a specified disease or other limited-benefit
coverage, and (b) any self-funded employee benefit plan to the extent not
preempted by federal law shall provide coverage for treatment of pediatric
autoimmune neuropsychiatric disorder associated with a Group A streptococcal
infection and pediatric acute-onset neuropsychiatric syndrome. Treatments
required by this section shall be recommended by the patient's licensed
physician and shall include, but not be limited to, antibiotics, medication and
behavioral therapies to manage neuropsychiatric symptoms, plasma exchange, and
immunoglobulin.
(2) For purposes of this section:
(a) Pediatric acute-onset neuropsychiatric syndrome means a class of
acute-onset obsessive-compulsive or tic disorders or other behavioral changes
presenting in a child or adolescent that are not otherwise explained by another
known neurologic or medical disorder; and
(b) Pediatric autoimmune neuropsychiatric disorder associated with a Group
A streptococcal infection means a condition in which a streptococcal infection
in a child or adolescent causes the abrupt onset of clinically significant
obsessions, compulsions, tics, or other neuropsychiatric symptoms or behavioral
changes, or a relapsing and remitting course of symptom severity.
-1-